District of Columbia statutes.
51-173

Employer participation in the shared work unemployment compensation program.

An employer who wishes to participate in the shared work unemployment compensation program shall submit a written shared work plan to the Director for the Director’s approval. As a condition for approval, a participating employer shall agree to furnish the Director with reports relating to the operation of the shared work plan as requested by the Director. The employer shall monitor and evaluate the operation of the shared work plan as requested by the Director and shall report the findings to the Director.

Oct. 15, 2010, D.C. Law 18-238, § 4, 57 DCR 7181